Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 620 Dependency, Neglect, and Abuse
620.140.
Dispositional alternatives.

In determining the disposition of all cases brought on behalf of dependent, neglected, or abused children, the juvenile session of the District Court, in the best interest of the child, shall have but shall not be limited to the following dispositional alternatives:

Informal adjustment of the case by agreement, which may be entered into at any time. Informal adjustment may include an agreed plan by which:

The parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision agrees that grounds exist for a finding of dependency, neglect, or abuse, and agrees to the conditions of protective orders under paragraph (b) of this subsection for a duration of up to one (1) year;

The action will be dismissed by the court, without hearing, at the end of the period agreed upon if no motion is brought alleging a violation of a protective order; and

If a motion is brought alleging a violation of a protective order, a hearing will be held at which the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision may contest the alleged violation, but may not contest the original grounds for a finding of dependency, neglect, or abuse. If a violation is found to have occurred, the court may consider other dispositional alternatives pursuant to this section;

Protective orders, such as the following:

Requiring the parent or any other person to abstain from any conduct abusing, neglecting, or making the child dependent;

Placing the child in his or her own home under supervision of the cabinet or its designee with services as determined to be appropriate by the cabinet; and

Orders authorized by KRS

403.715

to

403.785

and by KRS Chapter 456;

Removal of the child to the custody of an adult relative, fictive kin, other person, or child-caring facility or child-placing agency, taking into consideration the wishes of the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision. Before any child is committed to the cabinet or placed out of his or her home under the supervision of the cabinet, the court shall determine that reasonable efforts have been made by the court or the cabinet to prevent or eliminate the need for removal and that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child. If a child is to be placed with an adult relative or fictive kin the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision shall provide a list to the cabinet of possible persons to be considered;

Commitment of the child to the custody of the cabinet for placement for an indeterminate period of time not to exceed his or her attainment of the age eighteen (18), unless the youth elects to extend his or her commitment beyond the age of eighteen (18) under paragraph (e) of this subsection. Beginning at least six (6) months prior to an eligible youth attaining the age of eighteen (18), the cabinet shall provide the eligible youth with education, encouragement, assistance, and support regarding the development of a transition plan, and inform the eligible youth of his or her right to extend commitment beyond the age of eighteen (18); or

Extend or reinstate an eligible youth’s commitment up to the age of twenty-one (21) to receive transitional living support. The request shall be made by the youth prior to attaining twenty (20) years of age. A youth may opt in or out of extended commitment up to two (2) times prior to attaining twenty (20) years of age, with a ninety (90) day grace period between the time he or she exits and then reenters custody so long as there is documentation that his or her request was submitted prior to attaining twenty (20) years of age. The court may grant an extension or reinstatement of a youth’s commitment even if the concurrence of the cabinet occurs after the youth attains twenty (20) years of age. Upon receipt of the request and with the concurrence of the cabinet, the court may authorize commitment up to the age of twenty-one (21).

An order of temporary custody to the cabinet shall not be considered as a permissible dispositional alternative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 75, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 51, effective April 10, 1988; 1990, ch. 253, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 143, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 102, § 50, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 10, § 6, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 132, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 179, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 75, § 19, effective April 1, 2022.

620.142.
Custodial, permanency, and service options available to relative or fictive kin caregiver of an abused, neglected, or dependent child.

The cabinet shall develop custodial, permanency, and service options, including but not limited to monetary supports, that shall be available to a relative or fictive kin caregiver in the instance that a child, who would otherwise be placed in another out-of-home placement, is placed with him or her due to a cabinet finding that the child is abused, neglected, or dependent, as determined by an assessment or investigation conducted in accordance with this chapter. The custodial, permanency, and service options available to a relative or fictive kin caregiver shall include but not be limited to:

A notification form that explains and describes the process by which a relative or fictive kin caregiver can be certified as a child-specific foster home and the financial and support benefits that come with that type of placement;

A program for a one (1) time monetary benefit as established by an administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A per child given to the relative or fictive kin caregiver at the time a child is placed with the relative or fictive kin caregiver; and

A detailed placement packet that lists all types of supports, financial and otherwise, that are available to a relative or fictive kin caregiver given to the relative or fictive kin caregiver at the time a child is placed with the relative or fictive kin caregiver.

The cabinet shall disclose to a prospective relative or fictive kin caregiver each of the options established in subsection (1) of this section prior to the child’s placement. The prospective relative or fictive kin caregiver shall select the option that best represents the level of care and support needed for the child while the child is receiving treatment and care in the placement with the relative or fictive kin caregiver.

The custodial, permanency, and service options required by subsection (1) of this section shall reflect nationally recognized best practices.

The cabinet shall maximize services available under federal and state law, including but not limited to Titles IV and XIX of the Social Security Act, to fulfill the requirements of this section.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 73, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 180, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

620.145.
Cabinet’s assessment of child’s educational needs.

Within sixty (60) days of the commitment date of a child due to abuse, neglect, or dependency, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide the court with jurisdiction an assessment of the child to determine:

The child’s current and historical educational functioning;

The child’s emotional and behavioral functioning; and

The extent to which the child’s life experiences and circumstances of commitment have created a disabling condition requiring special educational programming or other services to provide the child an appropriate public education.

Upon discerning of an emotional, behavioral, or other disabling condition with negative impact upon a child’s educational experience, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services as guardian of the child shall ensure that whatever services necessary are obtained to allow the child the benefit of a free, appropriate public education.

Services required to allow the child a free, appropriate public education shall be limited to those required under Section 504 of Pub. L. 93-112, Pub. L. 94-142, or other federal statutes affecting children with emotional or behavioral disabilities.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include activities undertaken to ensure a child committed to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services receives adequate public education in the six (6) month case progress report required by KRS

620.240

.

Any child removed from his home due to abuse, neglect, or dependency and placed in the least restrictive appropriate placement available shall, for the purposes of acquiring an appropriate public education, be considered a resident of the school district where the placement occurs.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide a copy of the assessment required by subsection (1) of this section to the foster parent, or other agency or entity providing residential care to a committed child, within five (5) days of filing the assessment with the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 405, § 89, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 398, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 619, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 667, effective June 20, 2005.

620.146.
Notice to be given to school personnel of persons authorized to contact or remove a child of whom the cabinet has custody from school grounds.

If, as a result of dependency, neglect, or abuse, custody of a child is granted to the cabinet through an emergency, temporary, or permanent court order, the cabinet shall notify the principal or any assistant principal of the school in which the child is enrolled, and the school district’s director of pupil personnel, of the names of persons authorized to contact the child at school, in accordance with school visitation or communication policy, or remove the child from school grounds.

The notification required by this section shall be provided by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to the school:

By written notice via electronic mail or facsimile on the day that a court order is entered and again on any day that a change is made with regard to persons authorized to contact or remove the child from school. The verbal notification shall occur on the next school day immediately following the day a court order is entered or a change is made if the court order or change occurs after the end of the current school day; and

By electronic mail, facsimile, or hand delivery of a copy of the court order within ten (10) calendar days following the Cabinet for Health and Family Services’ receipt of the court order of a change of custody or change in contact or removal authority.

The cabinet’s mandate to provide the information required by this section shall cease when the court order under which the cabinet acts is rescinded or otherwise expires.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 159, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 159, § 44, effective July 14, 2018.

620.150.
Visitation.

Following an order that a child shall be removed from his home, the cabinet shall establish such terms and conditions of visitation with the child after consultation with the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child. If the parent or other person is dissatisfied with the visitation schedule, they may petition the court for review of the visitation schedule. The court, after reviewing all of the circumstances surrounding the case, may alter the visitation schedule if it finds the schedule set up by the cabinet has been arbitrary or unreasonable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 76, effective July 1, 1987.

620.155.
Appeals.

Any interested party aggrieved by a proceeding under KRS 610.010(2)(d) including the parent, child, guardian ad litem, the cabinet, and the county attorney may appeal from the juvenile court to the Circuit Court as a matter of right in the manner provided in the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure. The Circuit Court may order that the child may be removed to a suitable place, pending the appeal, if it appears by affidavit or sworn testimony that the child would be in imminent danger if left with or returned to his or her parents, guardian, or other person party to the appeal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 52, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 57, § 6, effective March 17, 1998; 2008, ch. 87, § 21, effective July 15, 2008.

620.157.
Appeal of cabinet’s determination that child should not be returned home. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 43, effective July 14, 2018; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

620.160.
Motion to seal child’s record.

Upon attaining majority, a person who was the subject of an action under this chapter may make a motion for the sealing of records relating to a petition filed under this chapter. In its discretion, the court may order the record unsealed for good cause shown.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 77, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 53, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Closed Courtrooms and the Public’s Right of Access, Vol. 67, No. 4, July 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 15.

620.170.
Voluntary commitments.

The cabinet may accept custody of a child who is voluntarily committed to the cabinet by the child’s parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody. However, the cabinet shall refuse to accept any child on a voluntary commitment unless adequate facilities, funds, and resources are available to care for the child, and the secretary finds that commitment would be in the best interest of the child.

As a condition of any voluntary commitment, the cabinet may enter into an agreement with the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of the child consenting to the commitment to pay an agreed sum for the care and treatment of the child. The sum shall be determined by the needs of the child and by the ability of the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody or other person exercising custodial control or to pay.

In the case of voluntary commitment, the cabinet may expend funds necessary to give the child all services available to any committed child including, but not limited to, diagnosis, treatment, foster care, day care, care and treatment in a facility, and necessary medical, psychological, and psychiatric care.

Any person who has consented to a child’s voluntary commitment may request the release of the child in writing addressed to the cabinet. The cabinet shall within ten (10) days release the child, or, if in the opinion of the cabinet it would be in the best interest of the child to remain in the custody of the cabinet, a petition shall be filed in the court of the county of residence of the child as provided in KRS

620.030

to

620.050

.

If, following a hearing on the matter, the court determines that the child can no longer benefit from those services offered by the cabinet or that the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of the child is capable of providing proper care, the child may be returned at once to the care of his parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of the child or to another person mutually agreed upon.

Any parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of a child who has consented to the child’s voluntary commitment to the cabinet shall be entitled to participate in treatment planning for the child for the pendency of the commitment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 78, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 54, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Juvenile Code Proceedings, § 258.00.

620.180.
Administrative regulations.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter. The cabinet may also promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to the requirements of Public Law 96-272 as to the maximum number of children who at any time during a fiscal year, will remain in foster care after having been in such care for a period in excess of twenty-four (24) months, together with the steps to be taken to achieve such goal.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to provide the following:

The method used to periodically review the status of children placed in foster family homes which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Within ten (10) calendar days of the temporary removal hearing provided for in this chapter, a case conference shall be held on all children placed with the cabinet for the purpose of establishing a specific treatment plan which may include preventive and reunification services for the child and his parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision. Additional case conferences and reviews shall be held as appropriate, but shall be held at least every six (6) months. The parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision and his counsel, if any, shall have the right to be present at and participate in such conferences. The child; the child’s attorney, if any; the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision and his attorney of record, if any; and the county attorney shall be notified of, and may be present at and participate in such conferences;

On-going case work and supportive services shall be provided as indicated to best meet the needs of the child as established by the review and planning process; and

There may be procedures for providing for appropriate visitation between the parents and the child based on the needs of the child;

The procedures for reporting to a committing court the status and plans for children committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected or abused and placed in foster family homes;

By January 1, 2019, the establishment and implementation of the processes, procedures, and requirements to ensure that children committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused and placed in foster family homes are timely reunified with their biological family or identified for and placed in a new permanent home. These processes, procedures, and requirements shall include but not be limited to the following:

A case review and recommendation submitted to the committing court related to whether the best interest of the child is reunification or termination of parental rights after the child has been committed to the cabinet a total of six (6) cumulative months;

An additional case review and recommendation submitted to the committing court every three (3) cumulative months after the initial six (6) months if a child is still in the custody of the cabinet;

A petition to the court of appropriate jurisdiction seeking the termination of parental rights and authority to place the child for adoption in accordance with this chapter and KRS Chapter 625 no later than after a child has been committed to the cabinet for a total of fifteen (15) cumulative months out of forty-eight (48) months; and

A plan to ensure, no longer than thirty (30) working days after a court enters a judgment of termination of parental rights to a child that is committed to the cabinet, that the cabinet shall complete and submit to the court all necessary paperwork to facilitate the child’s permanency plan, including but not limited to the presentation summary and identification of an adoptive home if determined; and

By October 1, 2019, the establishment and implementation of the processes, procedures, and requirements to ensure that children committed to the cabinet as dependent, neglected, or abused and placed in qualified residential treatment facilities are subject to case reviews within sixty (60) days of the start of each placement in accordance with 42

U.S.C. sec. 675

a(c)(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 79, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 55, effective April 10, 1988; 2018 ch. 159, § 22, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 11, effective June 27, 2019.

620.190.
Citizen foster care review boards — Local citizen foster care review boards.

There shall be established within each judicial district a citizen foster care review board to be appointed by the Chief District Judge or family court judge. The Chief District Judge or family court judge may authorize the creation of additional local citizen foster care review boards as needed.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall consist of not less than three (3) members and shall be appointed according to the following guidelines:

All members shall have an interest in foster care or child welfare;

At least two (2) members of each local citizen foster care review board shall, as far as practicable, be chosen from among the following professions: law, medicine, psychology, social work, and education;

Each local citizen foster care review board shall, as far as practicable, include a foster parent;

All members of each local citizen foster care review board shall, as far as practicable, be representative of the socioeconomic, racial, and ethnic composition of the area served;

Employees of the cabinet shall be prohibited from serving on the local citizen foster care review board;

All appointed board members shall serve a term of three (3) years, except that if a vacancy occurs, a successor shall be appointed to serve the unexpired term. The term of each member shall expire on August 1 of the appropriate year. Members may be reappointed and shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed; and

All members shall be certified prior to appointment by the state citizen foster care review board or its designee. For the purposes of this section, “certified” means acknowledgment of completion of initial training approved by the state citizen foster care review board.

Local citizen foster care review board members may be removed for nonparticipation, failure to meet training requirements, or other cause as determined by the state citizen foster care review board in compliance with its constitution and bylaws.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall annually elect a chairman and vice chairman to serve in the absence of the chairman.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall meet, at a place designated by the Chief District Judge or family court judge, as often as is deemed necessary to carry out the duties of the board. The local citizen foster care review board shall meet no less than four (4) times annually.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 80, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 56, effective April 10, 1988; 1992, ch. 412, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

620.200.
Support services for local citizen foster care review boards.

Secretarial and support services for each local citizen foster care review board may be provided by the District Court, or circuit clerk, or both, as ordered by the Chief District Judges or family court judges.

Local citizen foster care review boards may receive state and federal funding to insure total or partial funding of the board’s activities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 81, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

620.210.
Training of board members.

Training shall be established, approved, and provided by the state citizen foster care review board and its staff as provided by KRS

620.320

.

During the training session, each local citizen foster care review board member shall promise by oath given by the Chief District Judge or family court judge or a member of the court of justice to keep confidential the information reviewed by the board and its actions and recommendations in individual cases pursuant to the authority mandated to other officers of the court in KRS Chapter 522. Members of the local citizen foster care review boards shall be subject to the same penalties as officers of the court pursuant to KRS Chapter 522.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 82, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 57, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 301, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

620.220.
Information to Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program.

The clerk of the court shall forward to the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program a copy of each temporary custody order and commitment order or provide electronic notification in the manner prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts within fourteen (14) days of the date the order is issued.

When a child is voluntarily committed to the cabinet, the cabinet shall forward a copy of the placement agreement to the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program within fourteen (14) days of the time the child is placed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 83, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 58, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 301, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 187, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

Research References and Practice Aids

2008-2010 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget, 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 128, Pt. III, 15, at 616; and Judicial Branch Budget Memorandum, 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 190, at 1986 (Final Budget Memorandum, at X-29).

620.230.
Case permanency plans.

For each child placed in the custody of the cabinet by an order of commitment, the cabinet shall file a case permanency plan for the child with the court and send a copy to the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program as soon as the plan is prepared but no later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of the order. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 620.090(5), if a child remains in the temporary custody of the cabinet for longer than forty-five (45) days and if a request is submitted by the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program, the cabinet shall provide a copy of the case permanency plan for the child.

The case permanency plan shall include, but need not be limited to:

A concise statement of the reasons why the child is in the custody of the cabinet;

A statement of the actions which have been taken with regard to the child to the date of the plan;

A statement of the proposed actions which may be taken or are contemplated with regard to the child during the next six (6) months and during the entire duration of the time the child is in the custody of the cabinet;

Contemplated placements for the child;

If the child is placed outside the home, reasons why the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, the harms the child may suffer if left in the home, factors which may indicate when the child can be returned to the home, and efforts the cabinet or others are making to return the child to the home;

If the child is placed outside the home, the steps that the cabinet will take to minimize the harm to the child as a result of the action, both at the time of removal and on a long-term basis;

A description of the type of home, child-caring facility, child-placing agency or facility in which the child is to be placed or has been placed, and a statement why the placement is appropriate for the child, including but not limited to:

Age;

Educational needs;

Medical needs;

Emotional needs;

Relationship with parents; and

Number of children the home is authorized to care for and the number of children currently residing in the home;

If the placement is outside the child’s original county of residence, documentation that no closer placement is appropriate or available, and the reasons why the placement made was chosen;

A description of the services for the child and his family to be provided or arranged by the cabinet to facilitate the return of the child to his own home or to another permanent placement;

A list of objectives and specific tasks, together with specific time frames for each task, for which the parents have agreed to assume responsibility, including a schedule of regular visits with the child;

A projected schedule of time intervals by which each of the services, objectives, and tasks outlined in the case permanency plan should be accomplished and a schedule of time intervals which have already been accomplished or are in the process of accomplishment;

If the child is to remain at home, a description of the potential harm which could befall the child and measures that are being taken to prevent or minimize such harm; and

If the child is to remain at home, reasons why he cannot be placed in foster care or why such care is not needed.

Under no circumstance shall a child be placed in a home, facility, or other shelter with a child who has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for commission of a sex crime as defined in KRS

17.500

, unless the child committed for the commission of a sex crime is kept segregated from other children in the home, facility, or other shelter that have not been committed for the commission of a sex crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 84, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 59, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 301, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 52, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 47, § 7, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 122, § 10, effective July 14, 2022.

620.240.
Case progress reports.

The cabinet shall file for each child a case progress report at least once every six (6) months with the court and the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program. The first case progress report after the child is placed in the custody of the cabinet by an order of temporary custody or commitment shall be mailed to the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board Program and subsequent case progress reports shall be provided to the local citizen foster care review board within the case file. The case progress report shall include but is not limited to:

The length of time the child has been in the custody of the cabinet;

The number, location, and date for each placement during the time the child has been in the custody of the cabinet;

A description of the services and assistance provided or arranged by the cabinet to the parents since the last case permanency plan or case progress report, and results achieved;

A description of the efforts and progress of the parents since the last case permanency plan and case progress report, including the number and dates of parental visits and the extent, quality, and frequency of the parents’ communication with the child;

The barriers, familial and institutional, to returning the child home or releasing the child from the custody of the cabinet and services that are not currently available in the community;

An evaluation of the child’s current placement and services provided to the child;

Recommendations for necessary services required to release the child from the custody of the cabinet, to return the child home, or to facilitate another permanent placement;

A timetable for the child’s return home or other permanent placement; and

If return home is not recommended, a specific recommendation for a permanent placement, including termination of parental rights if appropriate. If continued foster care is recommended, an explanation as to why another permanent placement is not appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 85, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 60, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 301, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

620.250.
Local citizen foster care review board’s access to records.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall have access to all information and records of the cabinet pertinent to the parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child assigned to the local board for review. Information and records shall include, but not be limited to, case permanency plans, case progress reports, and case records.

Each local citizen foster care review board shall have access to all information and records of the court, the cabinet, and public and private child-caring facilities when pertinent to the child assigned to the local board for review. Information and records shall include, but not be limited to, case permanency plans, case progress reports, and case records.

All requested information or records, or both, not already before the local citizen foster care review board at the time of the six (6) months review shall be submitted by the agency or organization in possession of the information or records, or both, no later than five (5) working days after the receipt of the request.

If the local citizen foster care review board is denied access to any public or private information or records, or both, it may request the court to hold a hearing, at which time the court may require the agency or organization in whose possession the information or records, or both, are held to show cause as to the reasons why the information or records, or both, shall not be ordered surrendered pursuant to its authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 86, effective July 1, 1987; 1992, ch. 412, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

620.260.
Conflict of interest.

Local citizen foster care review board members who have a conflict of interest shall not participate in such review.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 87, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

620.270.
Scope of review of local citizen foster care review board — Regional forums.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

620.230

, the local citizen foster care review board shall review the case of each child placed in the custody of the cabinet by an order of temporary custody or commitment by the court in the county or counties which the local board serves. The review shall occur at least once every six (6) months until the child is no longer in the custody of the cabinet or until an adoption proceeding becomes final.

During each six (6) month review, the local citizen foster care review board shall review:

The past, current, and future status of the child and his placement as shown through the case permanency plan, case record, case progress reports submitted by the cabinet, and other information as the board may require;

The efforts or adjustment the parent has made in his circumstances, conduct, or conditions to make it in the child’s best interest to return him to his home within a reasonable period of time considering the age of the child;

The efforts of the cabinet to locate and provide services to the biological parents of the child;

The efforts of the cabinet and other agencies to facilitate the return of the child to the home or to find an alternative permanent placement if reunion with the parent or previous custodian is not feasible. The cabinet shall report to the board all factors which either favor or mitigate against any decision or alternative with regard to these matters; and

Any problems, solutions, or alternatives which may be capable of exploration, or other matters with regard to the child as the cabinet or the board determine to be explored with regard to the best interests of the state or of the child.

Upon completion of a training curriculum developed and provided jointly by the Administrative Office of the Courts and by the Department for Community Based Services and approved by the state review board in regard to child sexual abuse, the local citizen foster care review board may review, at the discretion of the board, a sample of all petitions filed in the District Court of the county served by the board alleging sexual abuse of any child, not to exceed two hundred (200) petitions per year statewide, in order to determine the adequacy of the investigation, and the appropriateness of findings, adjudication, and disposition of the court. The board shall have access to all records of the cabinet, medical professionals, and law enforcement agencies pertaining to these cases. The board shall provide the cabinet and the court a full report of the findings and recommendations concerning the review.

Notice of the six (6) month interested party review and the right to attend and participate in the six (6) month interested party review shall be provided to the child’s parents, if parental rights have not been terminated or surrendered; the parent’s attorney; the guardian ad litem, the attorney for the child, or both; the foster parents; the prospective adoptive parent; the relative providing care for the child; and the child who is a party to the proceeding. The cabinet shall provide the Administrative Office of the Courts Citizen Foster Care Review Board with the names, addresses, and any other needed contact information in order to provide adequate, timely notice of the review to these persons.

At least twice annually, the local citizen foster care review boards shall participate in regional community forums for members of the public to discuss areas of concern regarding the foster care system and to identify barriers to timely permanency, well-being and safety for children in out-of-home care. The boards shall report their findings to the State Citizen Foster Care Review Board in accordance with KRS

620.340

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 88, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 61, effective April 10, 1988; 1992, ch. 412, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 301, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 59, effective July 14, 2000; 2015 ch. 63, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 159, § 23, effective July 14, 2018.

620.280.
Employees of cabinet and other agencies to appear at local board meetings.

Each local citizen foster care review board may request in writing employees of the cabinet or other agencies or organizations, on five (5) working days’ notice, to appear at local board meetings when necessary to determine the progress made in placing the child in a permanent home. Should an employee fail to appear at such a meeting, the local citizen foster care review board may request that the court hold a hearing at which time the court, if the request for the hearing is granted, shall require the employee to show cause as to why he should not be compelled to appear.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 89, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 301, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 278, § 12, effective July 15, 1998.